Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2494
Regional behavioral health authority; aid; use; report.

(1) Each regional behavioral health authority shall use funds received pursuant to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act for:

(a) Opioid treatment and response;

(b) Data tracking related to the opioid epidemic;

(c) Supporting individual recovery and rehabilitation related to the opioid epidemic; and

(d) Opioid use prevention and opioid remediation.

(2) Each regional behavioral health authority shall report to the division as provided in section 71-2489.

(3) The division shall review the reports and require an authority to return unobligated and unexpended funds for the prior biennium to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Cash Fund.

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 14.